Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.170

Interchange of personnel between federal and state agencies—Employment status of federal employees participating—Retirement—Civil service.

Federal employees participating in an interchange may receive appointment by the state agency, or may be considered to be on detail with the state agency.

(1) Appointments of federal employees shall be made without regard to civil service laws or regulations. Compensation shall be in accordance with the usual rates paid by the state agency for similar positions.

An appropriate percentage of compensation shall be deducted and transmitted to the federal agency for retirement and insurance where the interchange agreement so provides.

(2) Federal employees on detail with a state agency remain employees of and shall continue to receive their compensation from the federal agency, subject to the terms of the interchange agreement.

[ 1959 c 102 s 4.]